Maryland, session 2026, SB0769.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) In accordance with § 19–102(d) of the Education Article, each of the following
projects is approved as a project for an academic facility, and the University System of
Maryland may issue, sell, and deliver bonds in the total principal amount of $26,000,000
for the purposes of financing and refinancing the costs of the following projects:
Towson University (Baltimore County):
Electrical Substation Expansion and Improvements
University of Maryland, College Park (Prince George’s County):
Health and Human Sciences Complex
University System of Maryland Office (Baltimore City):
Rita Colwell Center Deferred Maintenance
(b) In accordance with § 19–102(d) of the Education Article, those systemwide
capital facilities renewal projects for existing academic facilities of the constituent
institutions and centers of the University System of Maryland as authorized by the Board
of Regents are hereby approved as facility renewal projects for academic facilities, and the
University System of Maryland may issue, sell, and deliver bonds in the total principal
amount of $24,000,000 for the purposes of financing and refinancing the costs of those
academic facilities renewal projects.
(c) The bonds issued under the authority of this Act do not create or constitute
any indebtedness or obligation of the State or of any political subdivision thereof except for
the University System of Maryland, and the bonds shall so state on their face. The bonds
do not constitute a debt or obligation contracted by the General Assembly or pledge the
faith and credit of the State within the meaning of Article III, § 34 of the Maryland
Constitution.
– 1 –

Ch. 601 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –